Utah statutes.
30-2-5.   Separate debts.
(1)  Neither spouse is personally liable for the separate debts, obligations,
or liabilities of the other:
(a)  contracted or incurred before marriage;
(b)  contracted or incurred during marriage, except family expenses as
provided in Section 30-2-9;
(c)  contracted or incurred after divorce or an order for separate maintenance
under this title, except the spouse is personally liable for that portion of
the expenses incurred on behalf of a minor child for reasonable and necessary
medical and dental expenses, and other similar necessities as provided in a
court order under Section 30-3-5, 30-4-3, or 78B-12-212, or an administrative
order under Section 62A-11-326; or
(d)  ordered by the court to be paid by the other spouse under Section 30-3-5
or 30-4-3 and not in conflict with Section 15-4-6.5 or 15-4-6.7.
(2)  The wages, earnings, property, rents, or other income of one spouse may
not be reached by a creditor of the other spouse to satisfy a debt,
obligation, or liability of the other spouse, as described under Subsection
(1).
